Vermont, session 2025-2026, H202.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 3612 is amended to read:
§ 3612. PROHIBITED PRACTICES
* * *
(e)(1)(A) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not require a covered person
purchasing a covered prescription drug to pay an amount greater than the lesser
of:
(A)(i) the cost-sharing amount under the terms of the health benefit
plan, as determined in accordance with subdivision (2) of this subsection (e);
(B)(ii) the maximum allowable cost for the drug; or
(C)(iii) the amount the covered person would pay for the drug, after
application of any known discounts, if the covered person were paying the cash
price; or
(iv) the current National Average Drug Acquisition Cost plus a
professional dispensing fee in an amount equal to the professional dispensing
fee in effect for the Vermont Medicaid program.
(B) As used in subdivision (A)(iii) of this subdivision (e)(1), “cash
price” means the actual amount the individual would have paid if the
individual had purchased the drug without coverage for the drug under any
VT LEG #380110 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.202
2025 Page 3 of 7
health benefit plan, which shall include the lowest possible price the individual
would be able to obtain by using a drug discount card.
* * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 3632 is added to read:
§ 3632. DISCLOSURE OF AVAILABILITY OF COST INFORMATION
In order to assure covered persons that they are receiving the best available
price, each pharmacy in this State shall post a notice informing covered
persons purchasing prescription drugs that they may ask the pharmacy staff to
disclose to them the following amounts, as set forth in subdivision 3612(e)(1)
of this chapter:
(1) the cost-sharing amount under the terms of the covered person’s
health benefit plan;
(2) the maximum allowable cost for the drug;
(3) the amount the covered person would pay for the drug, after
application of any known discounts, if the covered person were paying the cash
price; and
(4) the current National Average Drug Acquisition Cost plus a
professional dispensing fee in an amount equal to the professional dispensing
fee in effect for the Vermont Medicaid program.
VT LEG #380110 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.202
2025 Page 4 of 7
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 9406 is added to read:
§ 9406. REPORTING ON PARTICIPATION IN 340B DRUG PRICING
PROGRAM
Annually on or before July 1, each hospital participating in the federal 340B
drug pricing program established by 42 U.S.C. § 256b shall submit to the
Green Mountain Care Board a report detailing the hospital’s participation in
the program during the previous calendar year, which report shall be posted on
the Green Mountain Care Board’s website and which shall contain at least the
following information:
(1) the aggregated acquisition cost for all prescription drugs that the
hospital obtained through the 340B program during the previous calendar year;
(2) the aggregated payment amount that the hospital received for all
prescription drugs obtained under the 340B program and dispensed to patients
during the previous calendar year;
(3) the aggregated payment amount that the hospital made to pharmacies
with which the hospital contracted to dispense drugs to its patients under the
340B program during the previous calendar year;
(4) the aggregated payment amount that the hospital made to any other
outside vendor for managing, administering, or facilitating any aspect of the
hospital’s 340B drug program during the previous calendar year;
VT LEG #380110 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.202
2025 Page 5 of 7
(5) all other expenses related to administering the 340B program,
including staffing, operational, and administrative expenses, during the
previous calendar year;
(6) the names of all vendors, including split billing vendors, contract
pharmacies, and pharmacy benefit managers with which the hospital
contracted to provide services associated with the hospital’s 340B program
participation during the previous calendar year;
(7) the number of claims for all prescription drugs the hospital obtained
through the 340B program during the previous calendar year, including the
total number of claims and the number of claims reported separately by payer
type, including Medicare, private insurance, and uninsured;
(8) a description of the ways in which the hospital uses savings from its
participation in the 340B program to benefit its community through programs
and services funded in whole or in part by savings from the 340B program,
including services that support community access to care that the hospital
could not continue without these savings;
(9) a description of the hospital’s internal review and oversight of its
participation in the 340B program in compliance with the U.S. Department of
Health and Human Services, Health Resources and Services Administration’s
340B program rules and guidance; and
(10) such additional information as the Board may request.
VT LEG #380110 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.202
2025 Page 6 of 7
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 9414b is added to read:
§ 9414b. ANNUAL PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISCLOSURES TO
CONSUMERS
(a) Annually, within 6 months following the end of the plan year, a health
insurer shall provide to each individual covered under a health insurance plan
offered or administered by the health insurer a report of the total amount that
the plan actually spent on prescription drugs for or on behalf of the covered
individual during the previous plan year, net of all rebates and discounts. The
health insurer shall send the prescription drug spending report to the covered
individual at the same address to which the health insurer sends the covered
individual’s explanation of benefits.
(b) Annually, on or before March 1, each covered entity participating in the
federal 340B drug pricing program established by 42 U.S.C. § 256b shall
notify its patients if one or more of the prescription drugs prescribed for the
patient by a health care professional affiliated with the covered entity was
purchased through the 340B program. For a covered entity that is a hospital,
the notice shall include information regarding how to access the report on the
Green Mountain Care Board’s website detailing the hospital’s participation in
the 340B program, including the ways in which the hospital uses savings from
its participation in the 340B program to benefit its community.
VT LEG #380110 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.202
2025 Page 7 of 7
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, with the first report under Sec. 3
(18 V.S.A. § 9406) due on or before July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380110 v.1